Skip to content

HTTPS clone URL

Subversion checkout URL

You can clone with HTTPS or Subversion.

Download ZIP
tree: c69c69cc4d
Fetching contributors…

Cannot retrieve contributors at this time

355 lines (286 sloc) 7.158 kb
Multichar_Symbols
! Verb lexicon
LEXICON Root
! Different categories for each conjugation. Ultimately they may share parts,
! but I think this is a good starting point.
Conj1 ;
Conj2 ;
Conj3 ;
Conj4 ;
Sum ;
LEXICON Conj1
amo+Verb:ama C1Pres ;
amo+Verb:amav C14PerfSystem ;
hortor+Verb+Dep:horta C1PresDep ;
! 1st conjugation present system
LEXICON C1Pres
C14Pres ;
C1PresSubj ;
C12Fut ;
C12Impf ;
C14ImpfSubj ;
CNon3Impv ;
CNon3InfPres ;
LEXICON C1PresDep
C14PresPass ;
C1PresSubjPass ;
C12FutPass ;
C12ImpfPass ;
C14ImpfSubjPass ;
C14ImpvPass ;
CNon3InfPresPass ;
LEXICON C1PresSubj
C1PresSubjAct ;
C1PresSubjPass ;
LEXICON C1PresSubjAct
+Pres+Subj:-e EndingsNonPresAct ;
LEXICON C1PresSubjPass
+Pres+Subj:-e EndingsNonPresPass ;
LEXICON Conj2
moneo+Verb:mone C2Pres ;
moneo+Verb:monu C14PerfSystem ;
vereor+Verb+Dep:vere C2PresDep ;
LEXICON C2Pres
C14Pres ;
C24PresSubj ;
C12Fut ;
C12Impf ;
C14ImpfSubj ;
CNon3Impv ;
CNon3InfPres ;
LEXICON C2PresDep
C14PresPass ;
C24PresSubjPass ;
C12FutPass ;
C12ImpfPass ;
C14ImpfSubjPass ;
C14ImpvPass ;
CNon3InfPresPass ;
LEXICON Conj3
rego+Verb:reg C3Pres ;
rego+Verb:rex C14PerfSystem ;
capio+Verb:capI C3Pres ;
capio+Verb:cep C14PerfSystem ;
sequor+Verb+Dep:sequ C3PresDep ;
patior+Verb+Dep:patI C3PresDep ;
LEXICON C3Pres
C14Pres ;
C24PresSubj ;
C34Fut ;
C34Impf ;
C14ImpfSubj ;
C3Impv ;
C3InfPres ;
LEXICON C3PresDep
C14PresPass ;
C24PresSubjPass ;
C34FutPass ;
C34ImpfPass ;
C14ImpfSubjPass ;
C14ImpvPass ;
C3InfPresPass ;
LEXICON Conj4
audio+Verb:audi C4Pres ;
audio+Verb:audiv C14PerfSystem ;
partior+Verb+Dep:parti C4PresDep ;
LEXICON C4Pres
C14Pres ;
C24PresSubj ;
C34Fut ;
C34Impf ;
C14ImpfSubj ;
CNon3Impv ;
CNon3InfPres ;
LEXICON C4PresDep
C14PresPass ;
C24PresSubjPass ;
C34FutPass ;
C34ImpfPass ;
C14ImpfSubjPass ;
C14ImpvPass ;
CNon3InfPresPass ;
LEXICON Sum
sum+Verb+Pres+Ind: SumPres ;
sum+Verb+Pres+Subj:si EndingsNonPresAct ;
sum+Verb+Fut+Ind:er EndingsPresIndAct ;
sum+Verb+Impf+Ind:era EndingsNonPresAct ;
sum+Verb+Impf+Subj:esse EndingsNonPresAct ;
sum+Verb:fu C14PerfSystem ;
sum+Verb: SumImpv ;
sum+Verb+Inf+Pres+Act:esse # ;
sum+Verb+Inf+Fut+Act:fore # ;
LEXICON SumPres
+1st+Sg+Act:sum # ;
+2nd+Sg+Act:es # ;
+3rd+Sg+Act:est # ;
+1st+Pl+Act:sumus # ;
+2nd+Pl+Act:estis # ;
+3rd+Pl+Act:sunt # ;
LEXICON SumImpv
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Sg+Act:es # ;
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Pl+Act:este # ;
+Fut+Impv+2nd+Sg+Act:esto # ;
+Fut+Impv+3rd+Sg+Act:esto # ;
+Fut+Impv+2nd+Pl+Act:estote # ;
+Fut+Impv+3rd+Pl+Act:sunto # ;
! Regular present indicative, first to fourth conjugations.
LEXICON C14Pres
C14PresAct ;
C14PresPass ;
LEXICON C14PresAct
+Pres+Ind:0 EndingsPresIndAct ;
LEXICON C14PresPass
+Pres+Ind:0 EndingsPresIndPass ;
! Regular present subjunctive, second to fourth conjugations.
LEXICON C24PresSubj
C24PresSubjAct ;
C24PresSubjPass ;
LEXICON C24PresSubjAct
+Pres+Subj:-a EndingsNonPresAct ;
LEXICON C24PresSubjPass
+Pres+Subj:-a EndingsNonPresPass ;
! Future indicative, first & second conjugations.
LEXICON C12Fut
C12FutAct ;
C12FutPass ;
LEXICON C12FutAct
+Fut+Ind:-b EndingsPresIndAct ;
LEXICON C12FutPass
+Fut+Ind:-b EndingsPresIndPass ;
! Future indicative, third & fourth conjugations.
LEXICON C34Fut
C34FutAct ;
C34FutPass ;
LEXICON C34FutAct
+Fut+Ind:-a EndingsNonPres1SAct ;
+Fut+Ind:-e EndingsCommonAct ;
LEXICON C34FutPass
+Fut+Ind:-a EndingsNonPres1SPass ;
+Fut+Ind:-e EndingsCommonPass ;
! Imperfect indicative tense, first and second conjugations.
LEXICON C12Impf
C12ImpfAct ;
C12ImpfPass ;
LEXICON C12ImpfAct
+Impf+Ind:-ba EndingsNonPresAct ;
LEXICON C12ImpfPass
+Impf+Ind:-ba EndingsNonPresPass ;
! XXX: It might be possible to do the imperfect indicative with just C12Impf
! and insert the -e in verbs-twolc.txt. But is it worth it?
! Imperfect indicative tense, third and fourth conjugations.
LEXICON C34Impf
C34ImpfAct ;
C34ImpfPass ;
LEXICON C34ImpfAct
+Impf+Ind:-eba EndingsNonPresAct ;
LEXICON C34ImpfPass
+Impf+Ind:-eba EndingsNonPresPass ;
! Imperfect subjunctive tense, all conjugations.
LEXICON C14ImpfSubj
C14ImpfSubjAct ;
C14ImpfSubjPass ;
LEXICON C14ImpfSubjAct
+Impf+Subj:-re EndingsNonPresAct ;
LEXICON C14ImpfSubjPass
+Impf+Subj:-re EndingsNonPresPass ;
! Imperative paradigms.
LEXICON CNon3Impv
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Sg+Act:0 # ;
CommonImpv ;
LEXICON C3Impv
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Sg+Act:-e # ;
CommonImpv ;
! Imperative forms common to al conjugations.
LEXICON CommonImpv
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Pl+Act:-te # ;
C14ImpvPass ;
+Fut+Impv+2nd+Sg+Act:-to # ;
+Fut+Impv+3rd+Sg+Act:-to # ;
+Fut+Impv+2nd+Pl+Act:-tote # ;
+Fut+Impv+3rd+Pl+Act:-nto # ;
! Passive imperatives. Factored out to make room for deponents.
LEXICON C14ImpvPass
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Sg+Pass:-re # ;
+Pres+Impv+2nd+Pl+Pass:-mini # ;
! Present infinitives.
LEXICON CNon3InfPres
C14InfPresAct ;
CNon3InfPresPass ;
LEXICON C3InfPres
C14InfPresAct ;
C3InfPresPass ;
LEXICON C14InfPresAct
+Inf+Pres+Act:-re # ;
LEXICON CNon3InfPresPass
+Inf+Pres+Pass:-ri # ;
LEXICON C3InfPresPass
+Inf+Pres+Pass:-i # ;
! Regular perfect system, all conjugations.
LEXICON C14PerfSystem
C14Perf ;
C14PerfSubj ;
C14FutII ;
C14Pqp ;
C14PqpSubj ;
C14InfPerf ;
! Perfect indicative tense.
LEXICON C14Perf
+Perf+Ind:0 EndingsPerf ;
! Perfect subjunctive tense.
LEXICON C14PerfSubj
+Perf+Subj:-eri EndingsNonPresAct ;
! Future perfect tense.
LEXICON C14FutII
+FutII+Ind+1st+Sg+Act:-er-o # ; ! Ludicrously special-cased to avoid too fragmented code.
+FutII+Ind:-eri EndingsCommonAct ;
! Pluperfect indicative tense.
LEXICON C14Pqp
+Pqp+Ind:-era EndingsNonPresAct ;
! Pluperfect subjunctive tense.
LEXICON C14PqpSubj
+Pqp+Subj:-isse EndingsNonPresAct ;
! Perfect infinitive.
LEXICON C14InfPerf
+Inf+Perf+Act:-isse # ;
! Endings for the present indicative.
LEXICON EndingsPresIndAct
+1st+Sg+Act:-o # ;
EndingsCommonAct ;
LEXICON EndingsPresIndPass
+1st+Sg+Pass:-or # ;
EndingsCommonPass ;
! Endings for non-present indicative tenses.
LEXICON EndingsNonPresAct
EndingsNonPres1SAct ;
EndingsCommonAct ;
LEXICON EndingsNonPresPass
EndingsNonPres1SPass ;
EndingsCommonPass ;
! Endings for the first person singular of non-present indicative tenses.
LEXICON EndingsNonPres1SAct
+1st+Sg+Act:-m # ;
LEXICON EndingsNonPres1SPass
+1st+Sg+Pass:-r # ;
! Endings common to most forms in the system.
LEXICON EndingsCommonAct
+2nd+Sg+Act:-s # ;
+3rd+Sg+Act:-t # ;
+1st+Pl+Act:-mus # ;
+2nd+Pl+Act:-tis # ;
+3rd+Pl+Act:-nt # ;
LEXICON EndingsCommonPass
+2nd+Sg+Pass:-ris # ;
+2nd+Sg+Pass:-re # ;
+3rd+Sg+Pass:-tur # ;
+1st+Pl+Pass:-mur # ;
+2nd+Pl+Pass:-mini # ;
+3rd+Pl+Pass:-ntur # ;
! Perfect endings.
LEXICON EndingsPerf
+1st+Sg+Act:-i # ;
+2nd+Sg+Act:-isti # ;
+3rd+Sg+Act:-it # ;
+1st+Pl+Act:-imus # ;
+2nd+Pl+Act:-istis # ;
+3rd+Pl+Act:-erunt # ;
+3rd+Pl+Act:-ere # ;
Jump to Line
Something went wrong with that request. Please try again.